Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and  made a part of ORS chapter 197A.
SECTION 2. (1) The definitions in ORS 197A.420 apply to this section.
(2) The Land Conservation and  Development Commission may adopt rules requiring local
governments to issue a land use decision, notwithstanding any comprehensive plan or land
use regulations or statewide land use planning goals, approving the development of specified
residential development types on certain lots or parcels under specified conditions.
(3) A rule issued under this section may only pertain to lots or parcels that are:
(a) Lawfully established units of land;
(b) Within an urban growth boundary;
(c) Zoned to allow residential use;
(d) At least 1,500 square feet;
(e) Not larger than 20,000 square feet;
(f) Not covered by slopes averaging more than 15 percent;
(g) Not  within an area identified in an inventory or map that is part of the local
government’s comprehensive plan as:
(A) Environmentally sensitive or containing significant natural resources;
(B) Open space or scenic areas; or
(C) Natural hazard areas, including floodplains, river greenways, landslide zones or
wildfire risk areas; and
(h) Vacant, including a lot or parcel:
(A) Created by any lawful division of land, regardless of when the division occurred.
(B) On which is sited a nonresidential structure that  is nonconforming or not suitable
for any lawful use.
(C) For which residential units were demolished more than five years prior.
(D) For which residential units were demolished within the previous  five years, provided
that the approved development would create net additional units and would use a  building
construction plan approved under section 5 of this 2025 Act.
(4) The residential development types that may be approved under this section  may only
include:
(a) Attached or detached housing, including  accessory dwelling units or prefabricated or
modular housing.
Enrolled House Bill 2258 (HB 2258-B) Page 1
(b) Types with a buildable area of:
(A) A size of  not more than 2,200 square feet for a single-unit dwelling, accessory dwell-
ing unit, duplex, triplex, quadplex or townhouse.
(B) An average per-unit  size of not more than 1,400 square feet for cottage clusters or
a multiunit dwelling.
(c) A multiunit dwelling with more than six and fewer than 12 units.
(d) Housing that complies with the minimum density requirements of the  applicable
comprehensive plan or land use regulations for the lot or parcel.
(e) Housing types whose  building plans have been approved under section 5 of this 2025
Act.
(5) The commission may specify for the approved  residential development types allowed
under this section:
(a) Processes that the local governments may apply  to the development, except for public
facilities or traffic impact analysis processes, which the local government  may establish and
implement.
(b) Applicable design standards and the scope of the design review, which may include
requiring the approval of the  use of any material, design or method of construction that is
approved under the applicable building code or approved under section 5 of this 2025 Act.
(c) Allowable variations or adjustments, or variation  or adjustment types, from the spe-
cific approval. A local government is not required to grant  a request for adjustment under
sections 38 to 41, chapter 110, Oregon Laws  2024, to development authorized under this sec-
tion except as specified by the commission.
(d) Limits on land use, including establishing appropriate minimum or maximum set-
backs, parking requirements, floor-to-area ratios or minimum dwelling units per acre.
(e) Standards for tree removal, replacement or planting. The standards for tree  removal
must include:
(A) Prohibiting the removal of heritage trees  or trees with a DBH, as defined in ORS
90.100, of 20 inches or more.
(B) Requiring the replacement of  or replanting on or adjacent to the developed lot or
parcel for every removed tree that is:
(i) Locally designated as a protected species;
(ii) Not deemed unhealthy by a certified arborist; and
(iii) Has a DBH of 12 inches or more.
(6) In adopting rules under  this section, the commission shall coordinate with the review
of building construction plans by the  Department of Consumer and Business Services under
section 5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
The Land Conservation and  Development Commission shall adopt initial
rules implementing section 2 of this 2025 Act on or before January 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. Section 5 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 455.
SECTION 5. (1) The Department of Consumer and Business Services may designate a
process by which an applicant for a building  permit for a residential structure of a type de-
scribed in section 2 (4)(a)  to (c) of this 2025 Act may receive building construction plan ap-
proval from the municipality, including through the use of:
(a) Typical drawings and specifications created by the department under ORS 455.062.
(b) Review of plans and specifications  approved by the department under ORS 455.685.
Plans and specifications submitted under this paragraph will  remain proprietary unless the
submitter requests otherwise.
(2) In  implementing this section the department may coordinate with approvals of land
use plans by the Land Conservation  and Development Commission under section 2 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Land Conservation and Development by section 1 (1), chapter ___,
Enrolled House Bill 2258 (HB 2258-B) Page 2
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5528), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the
planning program, is increased by $631,806 for rulemaking activities.
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2258 (HB 2258-B) Page 3